Missouri, session 2026, HB3490.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 253.415, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 253.415, to read as follows:
253.415. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Local Historic
Preservation Act".
2. Each city, town, village and each county regardless of classification may create by
ordinance or order a historic preservation commission, and grant to such commission any or
all of the following powers and authority:
(1) To conduct ongoing survey and research to identify and document buildings,
structures, objects, sites and districts that are of historic, archaeological, architectural,
engineering, cultural or scenic significance to the locality, the state or the nation;
(2) To recommend to the governing body designation of significant historic properties
as historic landmarks and historic districts, to prepare documentation supporting such
nomination, and to maintain a register of designated landmarks and districts, and of
significant historical, architectural and archaeological properties;
(3) To recommend to the governing body the establishment of regulations, guidelines
and policies to preserve the integrity and ambience of designated landmarks and districts.
The commission shall have the authority to review ordinary maintenance as deemed
appropriate, new construction, alterations, removals, and demolitions proposed within the
boundaries of a landmark or district, including review of plans for vacant lots and nonhistoric
buildings and structures;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3490 2
(4) To provide technical assistance to owners of older and historic, architectural,
archaeological, cultural and scenic properties concerning the preservation and maintenance of
the property;
(5) To recommend to the governing body programs and policies and economic
incentives to encourage the preservation of significant historic landmarks and districts;
(6) To prepare a comprehensive historic preservation plan, or a preservation element
to a master plan, to integrate the preservation program into the local government for planning
and zoning for land use, building and fire codes, special-use permits, community
revitalization, and heritage tourism;
(7) To participate in the conduct of land use, urban renewal and other city activities
affecting landmarks and districts; and
(8) To acquire by purchase, gift, or bequest, fee title or lesser interest, including
preservation restriction or easements, in designated properties and adjacent or associated
lands which are important for the preservation and use of the designated properties.
3. Public or private colleges and universities may observe local historical
preservation regulations at the discretion of the governing body of such public or
private college or university. The commission established under subsection 2 of this
section and the governing body of any such city shall not have the power to designate
any property or any building of any public or private college or university as historic
and subject such building or property to requirements or regulations of such city
relating to historic preservation.
4. Commission members should, to the extent available, be persons with
demonstrated interest or expertise in historic preservation. Representatives of historical
societies and residents of historic districts are encouraged as members.
✔